sv: Selleriform: Hackad; Huvud; Hjärtan; Blad; Mikrogrönt; Småplantor; Frön; Stjälkar; Stavar; Hel knippe; Övrigt
da: Selleriform: Hakket; Hoved; Hjerter; Blade; Mikrogrønt; Småplanter; Frø; Stængler; Stave; Helt bundt; Andet
pt-BR: Forma do aipo: Picado; Cabeça; Corações; Folhas; Microverdes; Mudas; Sementes; Talos; Palitos; Maço inteiro; Outra
nl: Selderij vorm: Gesneden; Krop; Harten; Bladeren; Microkiemen; Zaailingen; Zaden; Stengels; Sticks; Hele bos; Overig
sl-SI: Oblika zelene: Nasekljana; Glava; Srčki; Listi; Mikrozelenje; Sadike; Semena; Stebla; Palčke; Cel šop; Drugo
pt-PT: Forma de aipo: Picado; Cabeça; Corações; Folhas; Microverdes; Plântulas; Sementes; Hastes; Palitos; Molho inteiro; Outro
pl: Forma selera: Posiekany; Główka; Serca; Liście; Mikroliście; Sadzonki; Nasiona; Łodygi; Słupki; Cały pęczek; Inne
ro-RO: Formă de țelină: Tocată; Căpățână; Inimi; Frunze; Microplante; Răsaduri; Semințe; Tulpini; Bețișoare; Legătură întreagă; Altele
sk-SK: Forma zeleru: Nakrájaný; Hlávka; Srdiečka; Listy; Mikrozelenina; Sadenice; Semená; Stonky; Tyčinky; Celý zväzok; Iné
hr-HR: Oblik celera: Nasjeckan; Glavica; Sredina; Lišće; Mikrozelenje; Sadnice; Sjemenke; Stabljike; Štapići; Cijeli svežanj; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форма на целина: Нарязана; Глава; Сърцевини; Листа; Микрорастения; Разсад; Семена; Стъбла; Пръчици; Цяла връзка; Други
it: Forma di sedano: Tritato; Cesto; Cuori; Foglie; Micro-ortaggi; Piantine; Semi; Gambi; Bastoncini; Cesto intero; Altro
ru: Форма сельдерея: Нарезанный; Кочан; Сердцевины; Листья; Микрозелень; Рассада; Семена; Стебли; Соломка; Целый пучок; Другое
lt-LT: Salierų forma: Susmulkinti; Galva; Šerdelės; Lapai; Mikrožalumynai; Daigai; Sėklos; Stiebai; Lazdelės; Visa kekė; Kita
fr: Forme du céleri: Haché; Pied; Cœurs; Feuilles; Micro-pousses; Semis; Graines; Branches; Bâtonnets; Botte entière; Autre
tr: Kereviz formu: Doğranmış; Kereviz başı; Kereviz göbeği; Yaprak; Mikro filiz; Fide; Tohum; Sap; Çubuk; Bütün demet; Diğer
ko: 셀러리 형태: 썬 것; 통; 속대; 잎; 마이크로그린; 모종; 씨앗; 줄기; 스틱; 단 전체; 기타
nb: Selleriform: Hakket; Hode; Hjerter; Blader; Mikrogrønt; Frøplanter; Frø; Stilker; Stenger; Hel bunt; Annet
zh-CN: 芹菜形态: 碎芹菜; 整棵; 芹菜心; 芹菜叶; 芽苗菜; 幼苗; 种子; 芹菜梗; 芹菜条; 整捆; 其他
el: Μορφή σέλινου: Ψιλοκομμένο; Κεφάλι; Καρδιές; Φύλλα; Μικρολαχανικά; Σπορόφυτα; Σπόροι; Μίσχοι; Μπαστουνάκια; Ολόκληρο μάτσο; Άλλο
ja: セロリの形状: カット; 株; ハート; 葉; マイクログリーン; 苗; 種; 茎; スティック; 1束; その他
zh-TW: 芹菜形態: 切碎; 整顆; 菜心; 葉片; 微型蔬菜; 幼苗; 種子; 莖; 段狀; 整束; 其他
fi: Sellerimuoto: Pilkottu; Kanta; Sydämet; Lehdet; Versot; Taimet; Siemenet; Varret; Tikut; Kokonainen nippu; Muu
en: Celery form: Chopped; Head; Hearts; Leaves; Microgreens; Seedlings; Seeds; Stalks; Sticks; Whole bunch; Other
vi: Hình dạng cần tây: Cắt nhỏ; Củ; Lõi; Lá; Rau mầm; Cây giống; Hạt giống; Cọng; Cọng cắt khúc; Nguyên bó; Khác
th: รูปแบบขึ้นฉ่ายฝรั่ง: สับ; หัว; ยอดอ่อน; ใบ; ไมโครกรีน; ต้นกล้า; เมล็ด; ก้าน; แท่ง; ทั้งกำ; อื่นๆ
hu: Zeller formája: Aprított; Fej; Szív; Levél; Mikrozöld; Palánta; Mag; Szár; Pálcika; Egész csokor; Egyéb
de: Form des Selleries: Gehackt; Kopf; Herzen; Blätter; Microgreens; Setzlinge; Samen; Stangen; Sticks; Ganzes Bund; Sonstiges
cs: Druh celeru: Nasekaný; Hlávka; Srdíčka; Listy; Mikrobylinky; Sazenice; Semena; Řapíky; Tyčinky; Celý svazek; Ostatní
es: Forma del apio: Picado; Mata; Corazones; Hojas; Microbrotes; Plántulas; Semillas; Tallos; Palitos; Manojo entero; Otro